District of Columbia statutes.
29-938

Chapter 3 of this title applicable to associations.

Chapter 3 of this title shall apply to associations formed under this chapter, except to the extent that it is in conflict with this chapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720